Massachusetts, session 194th, S328.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding section 7H of chapter 29 of the General Laws or any other general or
special law to the contrary, effective for fiscal year 2026 and in subsequent fiscal years, the
department of elementary and secondary education shall annually submit a request to the general
court for an appropriation that complies with the commonwealth’s total funding obligation under
section 16C of chapter 71 of the General Laws.
of 1